dictionaries/sk/index.dic
absorpcia/U
admisia/U
aerofóbia/U
aglomerácia/U
akadémia/U
akademickosť/K
akreditácia/U
akumulácia/U
Alexandria/U
Alojzia/U
ambulancia/U
amorfnosť/K
analógia/U
anestéziológia/U
antepozícia/U
Antónia/U
aprobácia/U
arbitráž/D
aristokracia/U
arogantnosť/K
asignácia/U
astronómia/U
atrakcia/U
autobiografia/U
autorizácia/U
babraňa/U
bagáž/D
bakteriológia/U
baliareň/D
baňatosť/K
bandáž/D
báseň/D
Bazilej/D
bažantnica/U
beľ/D
besednica/U
bezdetnosť/K
beznádej/D
bezobsažnosť/K
bezpríznakovosť/K
bezvládnosť/K
bielizeň/D
bifurkácia/U
bigotnosť/K
biometria/U
blízkosť/K
bocianica/U
bodľač/D
bradavičnatosť/K
bridlica/U
brusiareň/D
búrlivosť/K
byľ/D
bystrica/U
cementáreň/D
cerkev/K
cieň/D
cigája/U
ctižiadosť/K
čakáreň/D
čarbanica/U
čeľusť/D
čereň/D
černozem/D
červavosť/K
čiernozem/D
čistiareň/D
čnosť/K
črievica/U
črvač/D
dedovizeň/D
dedukcia/U
defektnosť/K
deklamácia/U
dekoltáž/D
demografia/U
démonickosť/K
depolarizácia/U
detronizácia/U
dezorientovanosť/K
diablica/U
diaľ/D
dichotómia/U
disonancia/U
dlhosť/K
dohodkyňa/U
dochvíľnosť/K
dolkáreň/D
dôraznosť/K
dramatickosť/K
dramaturgia/U
drenáž/D
dreváreň/D
droždiareň/D
druhotriednosť/K
dvojdielnosť/K
dýchavičnosť/K
dyňa/U
ekvipáž/D
ekvivalencia/U
emocionálnosť/K
empatia/U
erekcia/U
esej/D
eucharistia/U
exaltovanosť/K
exhibícia/U
expander/D
faktickosť/K
faktografia/U
faloš/D
farbotlač/D
fermentácia/U
fľakatosť/K
Florencia/U
fosilizácia/U
fotomontáž/D
fotosúťaž/D
funkčnosť/KN
fúria/U
Gambia/U
garáž/D
geriatria/U
gombičkáreň/D
gramáž/D
gramotnosť/K
gravimetria/U
gumáreň/D
Halič/D
harpya/U
hať/D
hegemónnosť/K
hladiareň/D
hlavica/U
hlavohruď/D
hlinikáreň/D
hluchonemosť/K
hneď/D
homogénnosť/K
homoľa/U
horáreň/D
hrča/U
hrčavosť/K
humánnosť/K
húšť/D
hydináreň/D
hydrogeológia/U
chabosť/K
chamraď/D
chémia/U
chladiareň/D
chorobnosť/K
chrasť/D
chrbtica/U
chuť/KN
ihelnica/U
ilegálnosť/K
implikácia/U
individuálnosť/K
industrializácia/U
inklúzia/U
inštrukcia/U
inštruktáž/D
internacionálnosť/K
interpolácia/U
investícia/U
izotropia/U
jarosť/K
jazdiareň/D
jednostrannosť/K
jelenica/U
jeseň/D
kábeláž/D
kader/D
kafiléria/U
kaluž/D
kampaň/D
kamzica/U
karburácia/U
karosáreň/D
kasáreň/D
kaucia/U
kázeň/D
každodennosť/K
klimatizácia/U
kníhtlač/D
Kodaň/D
kohézia/U
koľaj/D
kolkáreň/D
kolmosť/K
kolonizácia/U
kolportáž/D
kompresia/U
koncepčnosť/K
konfirmácia/U
konšpirácia/U
kontrastnosť/K
kontrašpionáž/D
konvencia/U
kopulácia/U
korkáreň/D
košeľa/U
koštiaľ/D
kožovitosť/K
krádež/D
kreácia/U
kresliareň/D
krušnosť/K
krvavnica/U
kvalifikácia/U
kyptavosť/K
kyretáž/D
ladiareň/D
lahôdkáreň/D
lakonickosť/K
lampovňa/U
laň/D
ledač/D
lekcia/U
leptavosť/K
liaheň/D
liečebňa/U
listáreň/D
loď/D
logopédia/U
lož/D
lož/K
luminiscencia/U
lúpáreň/D
magnetickosť/K
magnezitáreň/D
machinácia/U
mandľa/U
manipulovateľnosť/K
masáž/D
mastonómia/U
mater/D
materskosť/K
maznica/U
meď/D
meniareň/D
merica/U
meritórnosť/K
mieň/D
Mikronézia/U
minutáž/D
mlaď/D
mládza/U
mľandravosť/K
mliekareň/D
módnosť/K
mokraď/D
moruša/U
mosadz/D
mozaikovitosť/K
mraziareň/D
múranica/U
myseľ/D
mýtickosť/K
nádrž/D
nadstraníckosť/K
nákazlivosť/K
naničhodnica/U
náplň/D
napnutosť/K
nástrojáreň/D
návštevnosť/K
nedbalosť/K
nedôstojnosť/K
negramotnosť/K
nehanebnica/U
nelegálnosť/K
nemotornosť/K
nenútenosť/K
neohrabanosť/K
nepočuteľnosť/K
neporiadnosť/K
nepriaznivosť/K
neprozreteľnosť/K
neskrotnosť/K
nesúmernosť/K
neter/D
neúplnosť/K
nevďačnica/U
nevládnosť/K
nevyspelosť/K
nezmernosť/K
nežičlivosť/K
níž/D
nostalgia/U
nútenosť/K
obec/D
obliekareň/D
obludnosť/K
obrazáreň/D
obštrukčnosť/K
obtlač/D
Oceánia/U
oceliareň/D
odmeranosť/K
odpočiváreň/D
ohybnosť/K
oligarchia/U
oplzlosť/K
opozícia/U
opraváreň/D
ortopédia/U
osamotenosť/K
osudnosť/K
ovčiareň/D
ozdobnosť/K
padúcnica/U
pamäť/DN
papiereň/D
parádnica/U
parazitnosť/K
Paríž/D
pasáž/D
Patagónia/U
pažiť/D
pečeň/D
pekáreň/D
penica/U
periférnosť/K
petrografia/U
pieseň/D
pizza/U
pláň/D
plastickosť/K
plášť/D
pláž/D
pleť/D
plieseň/D
plošnosť/K
plť/D
plutokracia/U
plynáreň/D
podivnosť/K
podradnosť/K
podsieť/D
pohrudnica/U
pochabosť/K
polarizovanosť/K
polotvar/D
polovica/U
pomätenosť/K
poplašenosť/K
porcia/U
porušiteľnosť/KN
poslucháreň/D
postruheň/D
potivosť/K
povrchnosť/K
pozícia/U
Poznaň/D
požutovaniahodnosť/K
pramater/D
pravdymilovnosť/K
predajňa/U
predajnosť/K
predsieň/D
prelietavosť/K
premietáreň/D
prerývanosť/K
prevádzkáreň/D
prezencia/U
prežitosť/K
priazeň/DN
priemernosť/K
priliehavosť/K
prírodopiskyňa/U
príťaž/D
prítomnosť/K
proklamácia/U
promptnosť/K
protivnosť/K
prudéria/U
púšť/D
pyšnosť/K
radiácia/U
rakétľa/U
rebélia/U
reďkev/K
regenerácia/U
rekriminácia/U
Remeš/D
represia/U
retroaktívnosť/K
revitalizácia/U
robotizácia/U
rohož/D
rovnocennosť/K
rozhadzovačnosť/K
rozmarnosť/K
rozpínavosť/K
roztratenosť/K
rozvodňa/U
rozvravenosť/K
rúbaň/D
sadziareň/D
samočinnosť/K
samopašnica/U
satirickosť/K
sebarealizácia/U
seč/D
sentencia/U
sériovosť/K
sieť/D
simulácia/U
situačnosť/K
skromnosť/K
skruž/D
slamenica/U
slávnosť/K
smeť/K
sneť/D
sója/U
sondáž/D
sopľavosť/K
speleoterapia/U
spletitosť/K
spomalenosť/K
spraš/D
sprievodkyňa/U
spupnosť/K
stárež/D
starostlivosť/K
sterilizácia/U
straníckosť/K
strieľňa/U
striháreň/D
strojenosť/K
stupaj/D
subvencia/U
súčinnosť/K
superveľmoc/K
sušiareň/D
svárlivosť/K
svetlica/U
svižkosť/K
sympatickosť/K
syntax/D
systemizácia/U
šampiňonáreň/D
šarmantnosť/K
škaredosť/K
škartácia/U
škrupulóznosť/K
šľapaj/D
špecializácia/UN
štádiovosť/K
štôlňa/U
štruktúrnosť/K
tabula/U
ťaháreň/D
táravosť/K
taxonómia/U
telocvičňa/U
textília/U
tiaž/D
tlač/D
tolerantnosť/K
Toruň/D
tradícia/U
trantária/U
trháreň/D
trofej/D
trstenica/U
trudnomyseľnosť/K
tvár/D
ubikácia/U
účinnosť/K
udiareň/D
unca/U
únikovosť/K
úroveň/D
uskutočniteľnosť/K
ušnica/U
útrpnosť/K
úvrať/D
vášnivosť/K
väzenkyňa/U
veľvyslankyňa/U
vernisáž/D
viacčlennosť/K
vidlica/U
vináreň/D
vlásočnica/U
vňať/D
voliteľnosť/K
vrstovnica/U
všivač/D
vycvičenosť/K
výraznosť/KN
výrobňa/U
výstuž/D
vyzretosť/K
xerokópia/U
zachmúrenosť/K
zanietenosť/K
zápač/D
zástankyňa/U
záťaž/D
zatvrdnutosť/K
zem/D
zhodnosť/K
zlievareň/D
zľuvotnica/U
zmeravenosť/K
zrnitosť/K
zvernica/U
zvodnosť/K
žehliareň/D
živelnosť/K
žízeň/D
žnica/U
žrebiareň/D
